Illinois, session 104th, HB4872.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Treasurer Act is amended by changing 5Section 16.5 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 505/16.5)7    Sec. 16.5. College Savings Pool. 8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:9    "Account owner" means any person or entity who has opened 10an account or to whom ownership of an account has been 11transferred, as allowed by the Internal Revenue Code, and who 12has authority to withdraw funds, direct withdrawal of funds, 13change the designated beneficiary, or otherwise exercise 14control over an account in the College Savings Pool.15    "Donor" means any person or entity who makes contributions 16to an account in the College Savings Pool.17    "Designated beneficiary" means any individual designated 18as the beneficiary of an account in the College Savings Pool by 19an account owner. A designated beneficiary must have a valid 20social security number or taxpayer identification number. In 21the case of an account established as part of a scholarship 22program permitted under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue 23Code, the designated beneficiary is any individual receiving   HB4872- 2 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1benefits accumulated in the account as a scholarship.2    "Eligible educational institution" means public and 3private colleges, junior colleges, graduate schools, and 4certain vocational institutions that are described in Section 51001 of the Higher Education Resource and Student Assistance 6Chapter of Title 20 of the United States Code (20 U.S.C. 1001) 7and that are eligible to participate in Department of 8Education student aid programs. "Eligible educational 9institution" includes elementary and secondary educational 10facilities in this State if the student attending the facility 11has a recognized disability or an individualized education 12program.13    "Member of the family" has the same meaning ascribed to 14that term under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. 15    "Nonqualified withdrawal" means a distribution from an 16account other than a distribution that (i) is used for the 17qualified expenses of the designated beneficiary; (ii) results 18from the beneficiary's death or disability; (iii) is a 19rollover to another account in the College Savings Pool; (iv) 20is a rollover to an Illinois ABLE account, as defined in 21Section 16.6 of this Act, or any distribution that, within 60 22days after such distribution, is transferred to an Illinois 23ABLE account of the designated beneficiary or a member of the 24family of the designated beneficiary to the extent that the 25distribution, when added to all other contributions made to 26the Illinois ABLE account for the taxable year, does not   HB4872- 3 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1exceed the limitation under Section 529A(b) of the Internal 2Revenue Code; or (v) is a rollover to a Roth IRA account to the 3extent permitted by Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.4    "Qualified expenses" means: (i) tuition, fees, and the 5costs of books, supplies, and equipment required for 6enrollment or attendance at an eligible educational 7institution; (ii) expenses for special needs services, in the 8case of a special needs beneficiary, which are incurred in 9connection with such enrollment or attendance, including 10elementary and secondary school expenses incurred as a result 11of a recognized disability or an individualized education 12program; (iii) certain expenses, to the extent they qualify as 13qualified higher education expenses under Section 529 of the 14Internal Revenue Code, for the purchase of computer or 15peripheral equipment or Internet access and related services, 16if such equipment, software, or services are to be used 17primarily by the beneficiary during any of the years the 18beneficiary is enrolled at an eligible educational 19institution, except that, such expenses shall not include 20expenses for computer software designed for sports, games, or 21hobbies, unless the software is predominantly educational in 22nature; (iv) room and board expenses incurred while attending 23an eligible educational institution at least half-time; (v) 24expenses for fees, books, supplies, and equipment required for 25the participation of a designated beneficiary in an 26apprenticeship program registered and certified with the   HB4872- 4 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1Secretary of Labor under the National Apprenticeship Act (29 2U.S.C. 50); and (vi) amounts paid as principal or interest on 3any qualified education loan of the designated beneficiary or 4a sibling of the designated beneficiary, as allowed under 5Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. A student shall be 6considered to be enrolled at least half-time if the student is 7enrolled for at least half the full-time academic workload for 8the course of study the student is pursuing as determined 9under the standards of the institution at which the student is 10enrolled. 11    "Recognized Disability" means a physical, developmental, 12or learning disability recognized by the State Board of 13Education, including, but not limited to, dyslexia or 14dyscalculia. 15    (b) Establishment of the Pool. The State Treasurer may 16establish and administer the College Savings Pool as a 17qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 18Revenue Code. The Pool may consist of one or more college 19savings programs. The State Treasurer, in administering the 20College Savings Pool, may: (1) receive, hold, and invest 21moneys paid into the Pool; and (2) perform any other action he 22or she deems necessary to administer the Pool, including any 23other actions necessary to ensure that the Pool operates as a 24qualified tuition program in accordance with Section 529 of 25the Internal Revenue Code.26    (c) Administration of the College Savings Pool. The State   HB4872- 5 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1Treasurer may delegate duties related to the College Savings 2Pool to one or more contractors. The contributions deposited 3in the Pool, and any earnings thereon, shall not constitute 4property of the State or be commingled with State funds and the 5State shall have no claim to or against, or interest in, such 6funds; provided that the fees collected by the State Treasurer 7in accordance with this Act, scholarship programs administered 8by the State Treasurer, and seed funds deposited by the State 9Treasurer under Section 16.8 of the Act are State funds. 10    (c-5) College Savings Pool Account Summaries. The State 11Treasurer shall provide a separate accounting for each 12designated beneficiary. The separate accounting shall be 13provided to the account owner of the account for the 14designated beneficiary at least annually and shall show the 15account balance, the investment in the account, the investment 16earnings, and the distributions from the account. 17    (d) Availability of the College Savings Pool. The State 18Treasurer may permit persons, including trustees of trusts and 19custodians under a Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or Uniform 20Gifts to Minors Act account, and certain legal entities to be 21account owners, including as part of a scholarship program, 22provided that: (1) an individual, trustee or custodian must 23have a valid social security number or taxpayer identification 24number, be at least 18 years of age, and have a valid United 25States street address; and (2) a legal entity must have a valid 26taxpayer identification number and a valid United States   HB4872- 6 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1street address. In-state and out-of-state persons, trustees, 2custodians, and legal entities may be account owners and 3donors, and both in-state and out-of-state individuals may be 4designated beneficiaries in the College Savings Pool.5    (e) Fees. Any fees, costs, and expenses, including 6investment fees and expenses and payments to third parties, 7related to the College Savings Pool, shall be paid from the 8assets of the College Savings Pool. The State Treasurer shall 9establish fees to be imposed on accounts to cover such fees, 10costs, and expenses, to the extent not paid directly out of the 11investments of the College Savings Pool, and to maintain an 12adequate reserve fund in line with industry standards for 13government operated funds. The Treasurer must use his or her 14best efforts to keep these fees as low as possible and 15consistent with administration of high quality competitive 16college savings programs. 17    (f) Investments in the State. To enhance the safety and 18liquidity of the College Savings Pool, to ensure the 19diversification of the investment portfolio of the College 20Savings Pool, and in an effort to keep investment dollars in 21the State of Illinois, the State Treasurer may make a 22percentage of each account available for investment in 23participating financial institutions doing business in the 24State. 25    (g) Investment policy. The Treasurer shall develop, 26publish, and implement an investment policy covering the   HB4872- 7 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1investment of the moneys in each of the programs in the College 2Savings Pool. The policy shall be published each year as part 3of the audit of the College Savings Pool by the Auditor 4General, which shall be distributed to all account owners in 5such program. The Treasurer shall notify all account owners in 6such program in writing, and the Treasurer shall publish in a 7newspaper of general circulation in both Chicago and 8Springfield, any changes to the previously published 9investment policy at least 30 calendar days before 10implementing the policy. Any investment policy adopted by the 11Treasurer shall be reviewed and updated if necessary within 90 12days following the date that the State Treasurer takes office.13    (h) Investment restrictions. An account owner may, 14directly or indirectly, direct the investment of his or her 15account only as provided in Section 529(b)(4) of the Internal 16Revenue Code. Donors and designated beneficiaries, in those 17capacities, may not, directly or indirectly, direct the 18investment of an account. 19    (i) Distributions. Distributions from an account in the 20College Savings Pool may be used for the designated 21beneficiary's qualified expenses, and if not used in that 22manner, may be considered a nonqualified withdrawal. Funds 23contained in a College Savings Pool account may be rolled over 24into: 25        (1) an eligible Illinois ABLE account, as defined in 26    Section 16.6 of this Act to the extent permitted by   HB4872- 8 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1    Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code; 2        (2) another qualified tuition program, to the extent 3    permitted by Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code; or 4        (3) a Roth IRA account, to the extent permitted by 5    Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.6    Distributions made from the College Savings Pool may be 7made directly to the eligible educational institution, 8directly to a vendor, in the form of a check payable to both 9the designated beneficiary and the institution or vendor, 10directly to the designated beneficiary or account owner, or in 11any other manner that is permissible under Section 529 of the 12Internal Revenue Code.13    (j) Contributions. Contributions to the College Savings 14Pool shall be as follows:15        (1) Contributions to an account in the College Savings 16    Pool may be made only in cash. 17        (2) The Treasurer shall limit the contributions that 18    may be made to the College Savings Pool on behalf of a 19    designated beneficiary, as required under Section 529 of 20    the Internal Revenue Code, to prevent contributions for 21    the benefit of a designated beneficiary in excess of those 22    necessary to provide for the qualified expenses of the 23    designated beneficiary. The Pool shall not permit any 24    additional contributions to an account as soon as the sum 25    of (i) the aggregate balance in all accounts in the Pool 26    for the designated beneficiary and (ii) the aggregate   HB4872- 9 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1    contributions in the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Program for 2    the designated beneficiary reaches the specified balance 3    limit established from time to time by the Treasurer. 4    (k) Illinois Student Assistance Commission. The Treasurer 5and the Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall each 6cooperate in providing each other with account information, as 7necessary, to prevent contributions in excess of those 8necessary to provide for the qualified expenses of the 9designated beneficiary, as described in subsection (j). 10    The Treasurer shall work with the Illinois Student 11Assistance Commission to coordinate the marketing of the 12College Savings Pool and the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Program 13when considered beneficial by the Treasurer and the Director 14of the Illinois Student Assistance Commission. 15    (l) Prohibition; exemption. No interest in the program, or 16any portion thereof, may be used as security for a loan. Moneys 17held in an account invested in the College Savings Pool shall 18be exempt from all claims of the creditors of the account 19owner, donor, or designated beneficiary of that account, 20except for the non-exempt College Savings Pool transfers to or 21from the account as defined under subsection (j) of Section 2212-1001 of the Code of Civil Procedure.23    (m) Taxation. The assets of the College Savings Pool and 24its income and operation shall be exempt from all taxation by 25the State of Illinois and any of its subdivisions. The accrued 26earnings on investments in the Pool once disbursed on behalf   HB4872- 10 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1of a designated beneficiary shall be similarly exempt from all 2taxation by the State of Illinois and its subdivisions, so 3long as they are used for qualified expenses. Contributions to 4a College Savings Pool account during the taxable year may be 5deducted from adjusted gross income as provided in Section 203 6of the Illinois Income Tax Act. The provisions of this 7paragraph are exempt from Section 250 of the Illinois Income 8Tax Act.9    (n) Rules. The Treasurer shall adopt rules he or she 10considers necessary for the efficient administration of the 11College Savings Pool. The rules shall provide whatever 12additional parameters and restrictions are necessary to ensure 13that the College Savings Pool meets all the requirements for a 14qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 15Revenue Code. 16    Notice of any proposed amendments to the rules and 17regulations shall be provided to all account owners prior to 18adoption.19    (o) Bond. The State Treasurer shall give bond with at 20least one surety, payable to and for the benefit of the account 21owners in the College Savings Pool, in the penal sum of 22$10,000,000, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his or 23her duties in relation to the College Savings Pool.24    (p) The changes made to subsections (c) and (e) of this 25Section by Public Act 101-26 are intended to be a restatement 26and clarification of existing law.   HB4872- 11 -LRB104 17843 SPS 31277 b1(Source: P.A. 103-778, eff. 8-2-24; 104-314, eff. 1-1-26.)